North Carolina statutes. Chapter 164. Concerning the General Statutes of North Carolina.
Article 2. The General Statutes Commission.

§ 164-12.
Creation; name.

There is hereby created and established a commission to be known as “The General Statutes Commission”.

The Commission shall be located within the General Assembly for administrative purposes only.

History.

1945, c. 157; 2011-97, s. 5.

State Government Reorganization.

State Government Reorganization; Later Transfers.

The General Statutes Commission was transferred to the Department of Justice by

G.S. 143A-53

, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864. It was subsequently transferred to the General Assembly for administrative purposes only by Session Laws 2011-97, ss. 5 and 11.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2009-273, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws 2010-152, s. 25.2, provides: “The General Statutes Commission shall study and recommend ways to make the General Statutes and the North Carolina Constitution gender neutral. These may include recommending legislative changes needed to make the General Statutes and the Constitution gender neutral and a process to be authorized by the General Assembly whereby changes that do not change the law can be made administratively by the Attorney General to make the General Statutes gender neutral.”

Session Laws 2011-97, s. 11, provides: “The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds of the General Statutes Commission are transferred from the Department of Justice to the General Assembly, with all of the elements of a Type II transfer as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

. The administrative rules of the General Statutes Commission are repealed but are deemed adopted as policies of the General Statutes Commission until it amends or repeals them. The Revisor of Statutes shall notify the Codifier of Rules of the repeal, and the Codifier of Rules may enter the repeal in the Administrative Code.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-97, s. 5, effective June 1, 2011, added the subsection (a) designation; and added subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For article on the North Carolina General Statutes Commission, see 46 N.C.L. Rev. 469 (1968).

§ 164-13.
Duties; use of funds.

It shall be the duty of the Commission:

To advise and cooperate with the Legislative Services Office in the work of continuous statute research and correction for which the Legislative Services Office is made responsible by

G.S. 120-36.21(2)

.

To advise and cooperate with the Legislative Services Office in the preparation and issuance of supplements to the General Statutes pursuant to

G.S. 120-36.21(1)

.

To make a continuing study of all matters involved in the preparation and publication of modern codes of law.

To recommend to the General Assembly the enactment of such substantive changes in the law as the Commission may deem advisable.

To receive and consider proposed changes in the law recommended by the American Law Institute, by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws or by other learned bodies.

Funds made available to the Commission by appropriation of the General Assembly, by allotment from the Contingency and Emergency Fund, or otherwise, may be used to employ the services of persons especially qualified to assist in the work of the Commission and for necessary clerical assistance.

History.

1945, c. 157; 1951, c. 761; 1957, c. 1405; 1969, c. 541, s. 3; 1971, c. 1093, s. 7; 1981, c. 599, s. 20; 2011-97, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-97, s. 6, effective June 1, 2011, throughout subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2), substituted “Legislative Services Office” for “Division of Legislative Drafting and Codification of Statutes of the Department of Justice” or similar language, and corrected the section references.

Legal Periodicals.

For an article on statutory easements by necessity or cartways, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 1943 (1997).

§ 164-14.
Membership; appointments; terms; vacancies.

The Commission shall consist of 13 members, who shall be appointed as follows:

One member, by the president of the North Carolina State Bar.

One member, by the General Statutes Commission.

One member, by the dean of the school of law of the University of North Carolina.

One member, by the dean of the school of law of Duke University.

One member, by the dean of the school of law of Wake Forest University.

One member, by the Speaker of the House of Representatives of each General Assembly from the membership of the House.

One member, by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate of each General Assembly from the membership of the Senate.

Two members, by the Governor.

One member, by the dean of the school of law of North Carolina Central University.

One member by the president of the North Carolina Bar Association.

One member, by the dean of the school of law of Campbell University.

One member, by the dean of the school of law of Elon University.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-76, s. 32.1, effective July 1, 2019.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-76, s. 32.1, effective July 1, 2019.

Appointments by the president of the North Carolina State Bar, the General Statutes Commission, and the deans of the schools of law of North Carolina Central University, Duke University, Elon University, the University of North Carolina, and Wake Forest University shall be made in the even-numbered years, and appointments made by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the president of the North Carolina Bar Association, the dean of the school of law of Campbell University, and the Governor shall be made in the odd-numbered years. Appointments shall be made for two-year terms beginning September 1 of the year when the appointments are to become effective and expiring August 31 two years thereafter.

If a member of the Commission resigns, dies, or ceases to be a member for any other reason, a vacancy exists with respect to that appointment and the original appointing authority shall appoint a new member to fill the unexpired term.This subsection does not apply when a member is continuing to serve under subsection (f) of this section.

All appointments shall be reported to the secretary of the Commission.

Notwithstanding the expiration of the term of the appointment, the terms of members of the General Statutes Commission shall continue until the appointment of a successor has been made and reported to the secretary of the Commission.

History.

1945, cc. 157, 635; 1947, c. 114, s. 3; 1967, cc. 17, 1230; 1969, c. 541, s. 4; 1971, c. 1, ss. 1, 2; c. 76; 1975, c. 394, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 709, ss. 1, 2; 1991, c. 739, s. 33; 1995, c. 509, s. 119; 2009-550, s. 8(a); 2019-76, s. 32.1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2009-550, s. 8(b), provides: “The initial appointment by the dean of the school of law for Elon University shall be for the term ending May 31, 2010. The initial appointment by the dean of the Charlotte School of Law (NC), Inc., shall be for the term ending May 31, 2011.”

Session Laws 2019-76, s. 3.2, provides: “The terms of the current members of the General Statutes Commission are extended to August 31 of the year in which they would otherwise expire.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-550, s. 8(a), effective August 28, 2009, in subsection (a), substituted “14 members” for “12 members” and added subdivisions (12) and (13); in subsection (c), inserted “Elon University,” substituted “deans” for “dean,” and inserted “and the Charlotte School of Law (NC), Inc.”

Session Laws 2019-76, s. 32.1, effective October 1, 2019, rewrote the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For recent development, “The Supreme Court of North Carolina’s Rulemaking Authority and the Struggle for Power: State v. Tutt,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 2100 (2006).

§ 164-15.
Meetings; quorum.

The Commission shall hold not less than two regular meetings each year, of which one shall be held in June and one in November, at such times during those months as may be fixed therefor by the Commission itself. The Commission may establish a schedule for other regular meetings. Special meetings may be called by the chairman, or by any two members of the Commission, upon such notice and in such manner as may be fixed therefor by the policies adopted by the Commission. The regular June and November meetings of the Commission shall be held in Raleigh, but the Commission may provide for the holding of other meetings from time to time at any other place or places in the State. A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum.

History.

1945, c. 157; 1983, c. 768, s. 24; 2011-97, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-97, s. 7, effective June 1, 2011, substituted “establish a schedule for other regular meetings” for “hold such other regular meetings as it may provided for by its rules” in the second sentence; substituted “policies adopted by the Commission” for “rules of the Commission” in the third sentence; and deleted the former next-to-last sentence, which read: “The first meeting of the Commission shall be held in June 1945 upon the call of the Attorney General at such time and upon such notice as he may designate.”

§ 164-16.
Officers.

At its regular June meeting in the odd-numbered years the Commission shall elect a chair and a vice-chair for a term of two years and until their successors are elected and assume the duties of their positions. The Revisor of Statutes shall be ex officio secretary of the Commission.

History.

1945, c. 157; 1947, c. 114, s. 2; 2020-69, s. 5.7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2020-69, s. 5.7, effective July 1, 2020, substituted “chair and a vice-chair” for “chairman and a vice-chairman” in the first sentence.

§ 164-17.
Committees.

The Commission may elect, or may authorize its chairman to appoint, such committees of the Commission as it may deem proper. The Commission may adopt such policies and guidelines not inconsistent with this Article as it may deem proper with respect to any and all matters relating to the discharge of its duties under this Article.

History.

1945, c. 157; 2011-97, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-97, s. 8, effective June 1, 2011, substituted “Committees” for “Committees; rules” in the section catchline; and substituted “policies and guidelines” for “rules” in the text of the section.

§ 164-18.
Reports.

The Commission shall submit to each regular session of the General Assembly a report of its work during the preceding two years, together with such recommendations as it may deem proper. The Commission may report recommended legislation to each annual session of the General Assembly as it deems appropriate.

History.

1945, c. 157; 2011-97, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-97, s. 9, effective June 1, 2011, added the last sentence.

§ 164-19.
Compensation.

Members of the Commission shall be paid the amount of per diem provided by

G.S. 138-5

for attendance upon meetings of the Commission, or upon attendance of meetings of committees of the Commission, together with such subsistence and travel allowance as may be provided by law.

History.

1945, c. 157; 1969, c. 445, s. 3.

§§ 164-20 through 164-24.

Reserved for future codification purposes.